Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1711
Road plat record; contents; entries, when made; duties of county board.

The county board shall cause a road plat record to be kept in which every road that is legally laid out must be platted. Each township shall be platted separately, on a scale of not less than four inches to the mile. All changes in or additions to the roads shall be immediately recorded and entered on the proper page of the road plat record with appropriate reference to the files in the office of the county clerk in which the papers relating to the same may be found.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 11, p. 544.